Colorado, session 2026A, HB1264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Student
Safety and Mental Wellness in Schools Act".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-1-151 as
follows:
22-1-151. School safety planning and reporting - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "BEHAVIORAL HEALTH REFERRAL" MEANS A FORMAL PROCESS
BY WHICH A STAFF MEMBER OR SCHOOL-BASED TEAM CONNECTS A
STUDENT TO APPROPRIATE MENTAL HEALTH OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
SERVICES, INCLUDING COUNSELING, CRISIS INTERVENTION, SUBSTANCE USE
SUPPORT, OR COMMUNITY-BASED CARE, WHEN CONCERNS ARISE
REGARDING THE STUDENT'S EMOTIONAL WELL-BEING, SAFETY, OR ABILITY
TO FUNCTION SUCCESSFULLY IN A SCHOOL SETTING.
(b) "CHARTER SCHOOL" MEANS A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED
BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF THIS
TITLE 22 AND A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE CHARTER
SCHOOL INSTITUTE PURSUANT TO PART 5 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF THIS TITLE
22.
(c) "EVIDENCE-INFORMED PROCESS" MEANS A PROCESS GUIDED BY
RESEARCH-SUPPORTED PRACTICES, PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS, AND
STATEWIDE GUIDANCE, INCLUDING SAFE2TELL PROTOCOLS.
(d) "PUBLIC SCHOOL" MEANS A SCHOOL OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT OR
A CHARTER SCHOOL.
(e) "SAFE2TELL REPORT" MEANS A REPORT MADE THROUGH THE
-2- HB26-1264

SAFE2TELL PROGRAM CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-31-606
REGARDING CONCERNS RELATED TO STUDENT SAFETY, THREATS,
SELF-HARM, BULLYING, WEAPONS, OR OTHER BEHAVIOR THAT MAY POSE
A RISK TO INDIVIDUALS OR SCHOOL COMMUNITIES.
(f) "SUPPORT AND RE-ENTRY PLAN" MEANS AN INDIVIDUALIZED,
TRAUMA-INFORMED PLAN DEVELOPED BY A SCHOOL-BASED OR
MULTIDISCIPLINARY TEAM IN COLLABORATION WITH THE STUDENT AND,
WHEN APPROPRIATE, THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN THAT
IDENTIFIES SPECIFIC INTERVENTIONS, ACCOMMODATIONS, BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH SUPPORTS, AND FOLLOW-UP ACTIONS DESIGNED TO ADDRESS
SAFETY CONCERNS, PROMOTE MENTAL WELLNESS, AND SUPPORT THE
STUDENT'S ACADEMIC AND SOCIAL SUCCESS.
(g) "THREAT ASSESSMENT" MEANS A STRUCTURED,
EVIDENCE-INFORMED PROCESS CONDUCTED BY A TRAINED SCHOOL-BASED
OR MULTIDISCIPLINARY TEAM TO IDENTIFY, EVALUATE, AND RESPOND TO
BEHAVIORS OR COMMUNICATIONS THAT MAY INDICATE A RISK OF HARM TO
THE STUDENT OR OTHERS, WITH THE PRIMARY GOAL OF EARLY
INTERVENTION, CONNECTION TO BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SUPPORTS, AND
PREVENTION OF VIOLENCE RATHER THAN DISCIPLINARY PUNISHMENT.
(2) (a) A PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL ANNUALLY PROVIDE STUDENTS,
PARENTS OR GUARDIANS, AND STAFF WITH INFORMATION ON ANONYMOUS
REPORTING THROUGH THE SAFE2TELL PROGRAM CREATED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-31-606, INCLUDING INFORMATION ON HOW TO SUBMIT
SAFE2TELL REPORTS AND WHAT HAPPENS AFTER A SAFE2TELL REPORT IS
MADE.
(b) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY COMPLY WITH THIS SUBSECTION (2)
THROUGH A SCHOOL'S OR SCHOOL DISTRICT'S EXISTING HANDBOOK,
-3- HB26-1264

ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION, STAFF ONBOARDING, OR AFFILIATED
WEBSITE.
(3) (a) EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT AND CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL
ADOPT OR UPDATE A WRITTEN POLICY DESCRIBING PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) RECEIVING AND TRIAGING SAFETY REPORTS;
(II) CONDUCTING A THREAT ASSESSMENT USING AN
EVIDENCE-INFORMED PROCESS;
(III) REFERRING STUDENTS TO A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH REFERRAL
OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SUPPORTS WHEN APPROPRIATE;
(IV) COORDINATING WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT WHEN REQUIRED BY
LAW; AND
(V) DEVELOPING A SUPPORT AND RE-ENTRY PLAN WHEN A
STUDENT RETURNS FOLLOWING A SAFETY-RELATED INCIDENT.
(b) A SCHOOL DISTRICT AND CHARTER SCHOOL MAY SATISFY THIS
SUBSECTION (3) BY ADOPTING MODEL POLICIES OR GUIDANCE ISSUED BY
THE SCHOOL SAFETY RESOURCE CENTER CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-33.5-1803 OR THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(4) (a) A SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OR CHARTER SCHOOL'S SCHOOL
SAFETY PLAN MUST INCLUDE A STUDENT WELLNESS RESPONSE PATHWAY
IDENTIFYING:
(I) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH REFERRAL OPTIONS AVAILABLE WITHIN
EXISTING SCHOOL OR COMMUNITY RESOURCES;
(II) CRISIS RESPONSE SERVICES AND FAMILY NOTIFICATION
PRACTICES CONSISTENT WITH STATE AND FEDERAL PRIVACY LAWS; AND
(III) RE-ENTRY AND STABILIZATION SUPPORT FOR IMPACTED
STUDENTS AND STAFF FOLLOWING A TRAUMATIC EVENT.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) DOES NOT REQUIRE THE HIRING OF NEW
-4- HB26-1264

PERSONNEL OR THE CREATION OF NEW PROGRAMS.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY, IN COORDINATION WITH
THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND THE SCHOOL SAFETY RESOURCE
CENTER, SHALL:
(a) MAKE A MODEL MESSAGE REGARDING:
(I) SAFE FIREARM STORAGE;
(II) YOUTH ACCESS TO FIREARMS PREVENTION;
(III) CYBERSECURITY; AND
(IV) ONLINE SAFETY, INCLUDING AWARENESS OF THE ISSUE AND
HOW TO SEEK HELP REGARDING:
(A) ONLINE HARASSMENT;
(B) CYBERBULLYING; AND
(C) DIGITAL THREATS; AND
(b) MAKE THE MODEL MESSAGE AVAILABLE AT NO COST TO ALL
PUBLIC, PRIVATE, AND ALTERNATIVE SCHOOLS AND SCHOOL DISTRICTS IN
THE STATE.
(6) (a) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2026, AND BY JULY 1 OF EACH
YEAR THEREAFTER, EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT AND CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL
CERTIFY COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (3) AND (4) OF THIS SECTION IN
A FORMAT NOT TO EXCEED ONE PAGE OF TEXT. A PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL
CERTIFY COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION IN A FORMAT
NOT TO EXCEED ONE PAGE OF TEXT.
(b) A SCHOOL DISTRICT AND A CHARTER SCHOOL MAY PUBLICLY
POST CERTIFICATION ON THE DISTRICT'S OR CHARTER SCHOOL'S WEBSITE
OR SUBMIT CERTIFICATION THROUGH AN EXISTING STATE REPORTING
MECHANISM. A SCHOOL DISTRICT AND A CHARTER SCHOOL IS NOT
REQUIRED TO INCUR NEW EXPENSES TO IMPLEMENT THE SAFETY PLAN OR
-5- HB26-1264

STUDENT WELLNESS RESPONSE PATHWAY.
(7) (a) (I) A SCHOOL DISTRICT AND A CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL
IMPLEMENT SUBSECTIONS (3), (4), AND (6) OF THIS SECTION USING
EXISTING APPROPRIATIONS AND OTHER AVAILABLE RESOURCES.
(II) THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE A SCHOOL DISTRICT OR
CHARTER SCHOOL TO INCUR ANY NEW EXPENDITURES.
(b) A PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL IMPLEMENT SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION USING EXISTING APPROPRIATIONS AND OTHER AVAILABLE
RESOURCES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-33.5-123 as
follows:
24-33.5-123. Safe firearm storage and youth access prevention
- messaging.
(1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
OF EDUCATION AND THE SCHOOL SAFETY RESOURCE CENTER, SHALL,
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-1-151 (5), CREATE A MODEL MESSAGE
REGARDING SAFE FIREARM STORAGE AND YOUTH ACCESS PREVENTION AND
MAKE THE MODEL MESSAGE AVAILABLE TO ALL PUBLIC, PRIVATE, AND
ALTERNATIVE SCHOOLS AND SCHOOL DISTRICTS AT NO COST.
(2) IN DEVELOPING AND DISTRIBUTING THE MODEL MESSAGE AND
RELATED GUIDANCE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCORPORATE
TRAUMA-INFORMED AND PREVENTION-FOCUSED PRACTICES THAT
PROMOTE STUDENT WELL-BEING, EARLY INTERVENTION, AND SAFE
REPORTING.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
-6- HB26-1264

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-7- HB26-1264